Indiana, session 2026, SB181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-1-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. If a tenant refuses or neglects to pay rent when due, a
landlord may terminate the lease with not less than ten (10) days notice
to the tenant unless:
(1) the parties otherwise agreed; or
(2) the tenant pays the rent in full before the notice period expires.
SECTION 2. IC 32-31-1-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) Not less than five (5) days before a landlord
files an eviction for nonpayment of rent or other charges, the
landlord shall provide written notice to the tenant that includes the
following:
(1) The amount owed.
(2) A calculation of late fees.
(3) Acceptable methods of payment.
(4) The date the landlord intends to file an eviction if charges
remain unpaid.
2026 IN 181—LS 6881/DI 151


(b) Written notice may be provided to the tenant by any of the
following:
(1) Pursuant to the lease.
(2) Electronic mail.
(3) In accordance with section 9 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 32-31-1-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. Notice is not
required to terminate a lease in the following situations:
(1) The landlord agrees to rent the premises to the tenant for a
specified period of time.
(2) The time for the determination of the tenancy is specified in
the contract.
(3) A tenant at will commits waste.
(4) The tenant is a tenant at sufferance.
(5) The express terms of the contract require the tenant to pay the
rent in advance, and the tenant refuses or neglects to pay the rent
in advance.
(6) The landlord-tenant relationship does not exist.
(7) The landlord has provided the notice required under
section 6.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 32-31-8-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A landlord shall do
the following:
(1) Deliver the rental premises to a tenant in compliance with the
rental agreement, and in a safe, clean, and habitable condition.
(2) Comply with all health and housing codes applicable to the
rental premises including the following:
(A) Completing required repairs issued by an eligible
enforcement authority under IC 36-7-9.
(B) Meeting standards required by a county health
department under IC 34-28-5.
(3) Make all reasonable efforts to keep common areas of a rental
premises in a clean and proper condition.
(4) Provide and maintain the following items in a rental premises
in good and safe working condition, if provided on the premises
at the time the rental agreement is entered into:
(A) Electrical systems.
(B) Plumbing systems sufficient to accommodate a reasonable
supply of hot and cold running water at all times.
(C) Sanitary systems.
(D) Heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems. A
heating system must be sufficient to adequately supply heat at
2026 IN 181—LS 6881/DI 151


all times.
(E) Elevators, if provided.
(F) Appliances supplied as an inducement to the rental
agreement.
SECTION 5. IC 32-31-8.5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.168-2020,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), and except as
provided in subsection (c), a landlord may not engage in a retaliatory
act in response to a tenant's engaging in one (1) or more protected
activities.
(b) Subsection (a) does not prohibit a landlord from doing any of the
following:
(1) Declining to renew a rental agreement at the conclusion of the
term of the rental agreement.
(2) Increasing a tenant's rent to that which is charged for
comparable market rentals, regardless of whether the increase is
effective:
(A) at the conclusion of the term of the rental agreement; or
(B) if provided for in the rental agreement, during the term of
the rental agreement.
(3) Subject to applicable law, decreasing or terminating one (1)
or more services provided to the rental premises, if those services
are decreased or terminated to all tenants on an equal basis.
(c) A landlord may bring an action described in section 4(3) or 4(4)
of this chapter (including as a petition for an emergency possessory
order under IC 32-31-6) under the following circumstances, or as
otherwise authorized by law:
(1) A violation described in section 2(1) of this chapter is caused
primarily by the intentional or negligent acts of, or a lack of
reasonable care by:
(A) the tenant;
(B) an authorized occupant of the rental premises; or
(C) a guest or invitee of the tenant.
(2) The tenant is in default with respect to rent due and has failed
to cure the default within the time set forth in
(A) IC 32-31-1-6; or
(B) the rental agreement.
(3) Compliance with an applicable building or housing code
requires alteration, remodeling, or demolition of the rental
premises, such that the tenant would be effectively deprived of
use of the rental premises.
(4) The tenant is in noncompliance with a provision of the rental
2026 IN 181—LS 6881/DI 151


agreement, and the noncompliance materially affects the health
or safety of the tenant or others.
(5) The tenant's rental agreement is for a definite term, and the
tenant holds over after expiration of the term.
(6) The landlord's action for possession of the rental premises is
made:
(A) in good faith; and
(B) before the tenant engages in a protected activity.
(7) The landlord seeks in good faith to take possession of the
rental premises at the end of the term of the tenant's rental
agreement in order to:
(A) use the rental premises as the landlord's own abode;
(B) alter, remodel, or demolish the rental premises in a manner
that requires the complete displacement of the tenant's
household; or
(C) terminate for a period of at least six (6) months the use of
the property as a rental unit.
2026 IN 181—LS 6881/DI 151